Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 1. Enforcement

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of roadblocks by state or local officials for purpose of enforcing fish or game laws, 87 ALR4th 981.

§ 23-6-101.
Arrest without warrant; when person arrested to be taken immediately before a court.

Any game warden, commissioner or other employee of the department designated by the commission and any Wyoming law enforcement officer may arrest without warrant any person violating any provision of this act. If the offense charged is punishable as a misdemeanor, the arrested person shall be taken immediately before the nearest or most readily accessible court having jurisdiction of the offense in the county where the offense is alleged to have been committed unless the officer accepts a promise to appear as provided in W.S. 23-6-102(c) at a later time or a bond pursuant to W.S. 23-6-102(d).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-104; Laws 1987, ch. 65, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “promise to appear as provided in W.S.

23-6-102

(c) at a later time or a bond pursuant to W.S.

23-6-102

(d)” for “written promise to appear at a later time or a bond pursuant to W.S. 23-6-102.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

Quoted

in

O'Brien v. State, 711 P.2d 1144,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 443

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 23-6-102.
Notice to appear in court; release upon promise to appear; release upon posting bond.

When the person arrested is not immediately taken before the proper court, the arresting officer shall prepare a citation in triplicate, giving written notice to appear in court, containing the name and address of the person arrested, the offense charged, and the time and place where the person shall appear in court.

The place specified in the citation must be before the proper court in the county in which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed.

The arrested person, in order to secure release as provided in this section, must give his promise to appear in court by accepting one (1) copy of the citation. The officer shall deliver one (1) copy of the citation to the person promising to appear. Thereupon the officer shall forthwith release the person arrested from custody.

An arresting officer arresting any person for violation of any provision of this act may instead of issuing a citation containing notice to appear in court if the violator is not immediately taken before the proper court, accept a bond posted in accordance with the bond schedule adopted by the court for delivery to the court.

Any officer violating any of the provisions of this section is guilty of misconduct and is subject to removal from office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-105; Laws 1987, ch. 65, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (c), deleted “written” before “promise,” and substituted “accepting one (1) copy of the citation” for “signing at least one (1) copy of the citation prepared by the arresting officer.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (d), see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-103.
Failure to obey citation; appearance by counsel; penalty.

No person shall violate his promise to appear given to any officer upon issuance of a game and fish citation regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was originally issued. A promise to appear in court may be complied with by an appearance by counsel.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-106; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2011, ch. 167, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “9th degree misdemeanor” in (b).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), deleted “written” preceding “promise” twice.

§ 23-6-104.
Procedure prescribed herein not exclusive.

The foregoing provisions [§§

23-6-101

through

23-6-103

] shall apply to all arrests without a warrant for violations of this act, but the procedures prescribed herein are not exclusive of any other method prescribed by law for the arrest and prosecution of a person for an offense of like grade.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-107.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-105.
Form for citations.

The department shall provide an appropriate form of game and fish citations containing the notice to appear which shall be issued in books with citations in triplicate. The director or his designee is responsible for the issuance of citation books, shall maintain a record of every such book issued and each citation contained therein, and shall require and obtain a receipt for every book issued.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-108.

§ 23-6-106.
Disposition and records of citations.

Every person issuing a game and fish citation as herein provided shall deposit one (1) copy of the citation with the court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense.

Upon the deposit of a copy of the citation with the proper court, the citation may be disposed of only by trial in that court, or other official action by a judge of that court, including forfeiture of the bail.

No person shall dispose of a game and fish citation or copies thereof, or of the record of the issuance of a citation in a manner other than as provided in this act.

The director or his designee shall require the issuing officer to return to him a copy of every game and fish citation issued to an alleged violator of any provision of this act and all copies of every game and fish citation which have been spoiled or upon which any entry has been made and not issued to an alleged violator.

The director or his designee shall also maintain or cause to be maintained in connection with every game and fish citation issued a record of the disposition of the charge by the court.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-109.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (c) and (d), see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-107.
When citation deemed a lawful complaint.

In the event the form of citation provided hereunder includes information and is sworn to as required under the general laws of this state in respect to a complaint charging commission of the offense alleged in the citation to have been committed, then the citation when filed with the proper court is a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution under this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-110.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to at the end of this section, see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-108.
Record of game and fish cases; report of convictions to department.

Every judge of any court shall keep or cause to be kept a record of every game and fish complaint, game and fish citation, or other legal form of game and fish charge deposited with or presented to the court, and shall keep a record of every official action by the court, including a record of every conviction, forfeiture of bail, judgment of acquittal, and the amount of fine or forfeiture resulting from every such complaint or citation deposited with or presented to the court.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, within ten (10) days after the conviction or forfeiture of bail of a person upon a charge of violating any provision of this act, the judge or clerk of the court in which the conviction was had or bail was forfeited, shall forward to the department an abstract of the court record covering the case in which the person was convicted or forfeited bail. The abstract shall be made upon a form furnished by the department and shall include the name and address of the party charged, the number of his game or fish license, if any, the nature of the offense, the date of hearing, the plea, the judgment, or whether bail was forfeited, and the amount of fine, forfeiture or penalty imposed.

Upon implementation of a case management system in a circuit court or district court, the supreme court shall, on behalf of the circuit court or district court, furnish the abstract of the court record required under this section to the department. The abstract furnished under this section shall include the information required in W.S. 7-19-107(k).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-111; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, § 1; 2020 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “justice of the peace” preceding “judge”; and in (b) deleted “every justice of the peace” preceding “judge.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

inserted “the” before “judge” in the first sentence in subsection (b).

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, within ten (10)” for “Within thirty (30),” substituted “an abstract” for “a certified,” and substituted “court record” for “record of the court” in the first sentence of (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 23-6-109.
Search with or without warrant; confiscation and disposition of wildlife.

Any person authorized to enforce the provisions of this act may seize and take into custody any wildlife which has been unlawfully taken or which is unlawfully in possession. Any wildlife so confiscated may be sold to the best advantage and funds received credited to the Wyoming game and fish fund.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 114, § 1.

Any person authorized to enforce the provisions of this act may search with a search warrant any place or property for any wildlife which he may have probable cause to believe was taken or is possessed unlawfully.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 25; C.S. 1945, § 47-125; W.S. 1957, § 23-24; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-112; 2014 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (b) which read: “Any person authorized to enforce the provisions of this act may search without warrant, any camp, camp outfit, pack, pack outfit, pack animal, motor vehicle, boat, wagon or trailer for any wildlife which he has probable cause to believe was taken or is possessed unlawfully.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 23-1-102(a)(xiii).

Constitutionality. —

This section, giving game wardens and deputy wardens the right to search without warrant automobiles for wildlife taken in violation of state law, does not violate art. 1, § 4, Wyo. Const.Gilkison v. State, 404 P.2d 755,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1965).

Test of legality of search and seizure. —

In determining the legality of a search and seizure under this section, the crux of the matter is whether or not under the circumstances a man of prudence and caution would have had reason to believe that wildlife taken or possessed in violation of the laws of this state were present in accused's vehicle. Gilkison v. State, 404 P.2d 755,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1965).

Where an officer stopped defendant's vehicle based on an agent's request, suppression was not warranted under the Fourth Amendment and the vertical collective knowledge doctrine because the agent had reasonable suspicion that defendant was a felon in possession of a firearm; this section was irrelevant to the analysis because (1) the court relied on the agent's reasonable suspicion rather than the officer's subjective belief that the officer stopped defendant to investigate a hunting violation, and (2) the statute addressed probable cause to search, not probable cause to stop a vehicle.
United States v. Whitley, 680 F.3d 1227, 2012 U.S. App. LEXIS 11134 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2012).

The right granted to search without a warrant refers only to “wildlife.”

Hamblin v. Arzy, 472 P.2d 933,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1970).

Law reviews. —

For note on authority of game wardens to search automobiles without a warrant, see XIII Wyo. L.J. 56 (1958).

§ 23-6-110.
Refusal to display proper license prima facie evidence of guilt.

Any person taking any wildlife who fails or refuses upon demand of any person authorized to enforce the provisions of this act to produce his proper license if a license is required for the wildlife taken, is prima facie evidence of taking the particular wildlife without a license.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 40; C.S. 1945, § 47-213; W.S. 1957, § 23-43; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-113.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

§ 23-6-111.
Inspection of premises or records.

The owner or operator of any commercial operation or business permitted under this act shall upon request of any department personnel exhibit the records required to be maintained by the commission and permit inspection of the premises pertaining to the business or operation, during reasonable business hours.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-114.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

Federal pretextual search invalid. —

Federal agent's warrantless search was not a permissible administrative search pursuant to this section, where the presence and active participation of the federal agent during the search of taxidermist's shop, and the federal agent's insistence that the state agent accompany him, established as a matter of law that the federal agent used the state regulatory inspection as a pretext for an investigatory search. United States v. Johnson, 994 F.2d 740, 1993 U.S. App. LEXIS 11507 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1993).